Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2305.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142B.16, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Requirement to post conditional license. For licensed family child care providers and child care centers, upon receipt of any order of conditional license issued by the commissioner under this section, and notwithstanding a pending request for reconsideration of the order of conditional license by the license holder, the license holder shall post the order of conditional license in a place that is conspicuous to the people receiving services and all visitors to the facility for two years. When the order of conditional license is accompanied by a maltreatment investigation memorandum prepared under section 626.557 or chapter 260E, the investigation memoranda must be posted with the order of conditional licensenew text begin , and the license holder must post both in a place that is conspicuous to the people receiving services and all visitors to the facility for ten yearsnew text end . Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142B.18, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Requirement to post licensing order or fine. For licensed family child care providers and child care centers, upon receipt of any order of license suspension, temporary immediate suspension, fine, or revocation issued by the commissioner under this section, and notwithstanding a pending appeal of the order of license suspension, temporary immediate suspension, fine, or revocation by the license holder, the license holder shall post the order of license suspension, temporary immediate suspension, fine, or revocation in a place that is conspicuous to the people receiving services and all visitors to the facility for two years. When the order of license suspension, temporary immediate suspension, fine, or revocation is accompanied by a maltreatment investigation memorandum prepared under section 626.557 or chapter 260E, the investigation memoranda must be posted with the order of license suspension, temporary immediate suspension, fine, or revocationnew text begin , and the license holder must post both in a place that is conspicuous to the people receiving services and all visitors to the facility for ten yearsnew text end .